Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-956
Department; duties; contract; pharmacy benefit manager; comply with Pharmacy Benefit Manager Licensure and Regulation Act.

(1) The department shall (a) enter into a multistate purchasing pool, (b) negotiate directly with manufacturers or labelers, or (c) contract with a pharmacy benefit manager for negotiated discounts or rebates for all prescription drugs under the medical assistance program in order to achieve the lowest available price for such drugs under such program.

(2) Any contract under the Medicaid Prescription Drug Act with a pharmacy benefit manager or a managed care organization using a pharmacy benefit manager shall require any pharmacy benefit manager that is a party or otherwise subject to the contract to comply with the Pharmacy Benefit Manager Licensure and Regulation Act.

Laws 2008, LB830, § 8;

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 25.